Illinois, session 104th, SB1512.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4Article 1. General Provisions 5    Section 1-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 6Consumer Financial Protection Law. 7    Section 1-5. Definitions. 8    (a) As used in this Act:9    "Affiliate" means any person that controls, is controlled 10by, or is under common control with another person. For 11purposes of this definition, "control" means the possession, 12direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the 13direction of the management and policies of a person.14    "Confidential supervisory information" means that the 15record or information is exempt from public disclosure under 16any federal or State statute or rules and regulations 17implementing federal or State statute.18    "Consumer" means an individual; an agent, trustee, or 19representative acting on behalf of an individual; or the 20estate, trust, or joint trust of an individual, however 21denominated.22    "Covered employee" means any individual performing tasks   SB1512- 2 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1related to the offering or provision of a financial product or 2service.3    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 4Professional Regulation.5    "Division of Banking" means the Division of Banking within 6the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation.7    "Division of Financial Institutions" means the Division of 8Financial Institutions within the Department of Financial and 9Professional Regulation. 10    "Financial law" means a federal or Illinois law that 11directly and specifically regulates the manner, content, or 12terms and conditions of any financial transaction, or any 13account, product, or service related thereto, with respect to 14a consumer.15    "Financial product or service" means any financial product 16or financial service offered or provided by any person that is 17regulated or required to be regulated by the Department or any 18other financial product or service offered or sold to 19consumers. 20    "Person" includes, without limitation, any individual, 21corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, 22proprietorship, syndicate, limited liability company, 23association, joint venture, government, governmental 24subsection, agency, or instrumentality, public corporation or 25joint stock company, any other organization, or legal or 26commercial entity.  SB1512- 3 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    "Regulated person" or "person regulated" means, to the 2extent not preempted by federal law, any person that (1) 3engages in offering or providing a financial product or 4service to a resident of this State, (2) any affiliate of a 5regulated person, (3) service providers, and (4) related 6persons.7    "Related person" means (1) any director, officer, or 8employee charged with managerial responsibility for, or the 9controlling shareholder of, or an agent for, a regulated 10person; (2) any shareholder, consultant, joint venture 11partner, or other person, as determined by the Department, by 12rule or on a case-by-case basis, who materially participates 13in the conduct of the affairs of a regulated person; and (3) 14any independent contractor, including any attorney, appraiser, 15or accountant, who knowingly or recklessly participates in any 16(i) violation of any provision of law or regulation, or (ii) 17breach of a fiduciary duty.18    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 19Professional Regulation and any authorized representative of 20the Secretary.21    "Service provider" means any person that provides a 22material service to a regulated person in connection with the 23offering or provision by that regulated person of a financial 24product or service, including a person that either:25        (1) Participates in designing, operating, or 26    maintaining the financial product or service.  SB1512- 4 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1        (2) Processes transactions relating to the financial 2    product or service, other than unknowingly or incidentally 3    transmitting or processing financial data in a manner in 4    which the data is undifferentiated from other types of 5    data of the same form as the person transmits or 6    processes.7    "Service provider" does not include a person solely by 8virtue of that person offering or providing to a regulated 9person either:10        (1) A support service of a type provided to businesses 11    generally or a similar ministerial service.12        (2) Time or space for an advertisement for a financial 13    product or service through print, newspaper, or electronic 14    media.15    (b) Whenever the terms "include", "including", or terms of 16similar import appear in this Act, unless the context requires 17otherwise, such terms shall not be construed to imply the 18exclusion of any person, class, or thing not specifically 19included.20    (c) A reference in this Act to any other law or statute of 21this State, or of any other jurisdiction, means such law or 22statute as amended on the effective date of this Act, and 23unless the context otherwise requires, as amended thereafter. 24    Section 1-10. Findings and purpose. 25    (a) The General Assembly finds and declares the following:  SB1512- 5 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1        (1) The lack of a dedicated financial services 2    regulator with broad authority over providers of financial 3    products and services has left the people of Illinois 4    vulnerable to abuse and forced Illinois businesses to 5    compete with unscrupulous providers. The victimization of 6    Illinois consumers, including those who lack a safety net 7    of personal or household financial resources, not only 8    harms individuals but also has broader social and economic 9    costs to the State, including increased caseloads for 10    social safety net programs. These problems become even 11    more acute in times of crisis, including disasters, 12    financial crises, and economic recessions. Therefore, the 13    General Assembly should enact statutory measures to 14    protect the people of Illinois from abuses in the 15    marketplace for financial products and services.16        (2) Technological innovation offers great promise for 17    the more effective and efficient provision of financial 18    products and services to the people of Illinois but also 19    poses new risks to consumers and challenges to financial 20    services regulators and law enforcement in addressing 21    those risks. These challenges include, but are not limited 22    to, preventing regulatory arbitrage, maintaining effective 23    oversight of new providers of financial products and 24    services, promoting the stability of Illinois financial 25    institutions and the financial system, protecting the 26    confidentiality, integrity, and availability of   SB1512- 6 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    information systems and consumer information stored on 2    those information systems, and guarding against fraud, 3    money laundering, terrorist financing, and other financial 4    crimes.5        (3) Robust financial protections enable wealth 6    building and promote a vibrant economy. They are 7    especially important among various populations, including, 8    but not limited to, low-income and moderate-income 9    households, historically marginalized communities, 10    military service members, seniors, students, and new 11    residents of this State. Unfair, deceptive, or abusive 12    practices in the provision of financial products and 13    services undermine the public confidence that is essential 14    to the continued functioning of the financial system, 15    sound extensions of credit to consumers, and the 16    protection of consumers.17        (4) It is the intent of the General Assembly to enact 18    this Act to strengthen financial protections by expanding 19    the ability of the Department of Financial and 20    Professional Regulation to improve accountability and 21    transparency in the Illinois financial system, provide 22    financial education, and protect Illinois persons from 23    abusive financial practices, while prioritizing the 24    prevention of unethical businesses from harming the most 25    vulnerable populations, including low-income and 26    moderate-income households, historically marginalized   SB1512- 7 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    communities, military service members, seniors, students, 2    and new residents of this State.3    (b) Among the purposes of this Act shall be the promotion 4of general welfare, fair competition, and wealth creation in 5this State, including by doing the following:6        (1) Promoting nondiscriminatory access to responsible, 7    affordable credit on terms that reasonably reflect 8    consumers' ability to repay.9        (2) Promoting nondiscriminatory access to financial 10    products and services that are understandable and not 11    unfair, deceptive, or abusive.12        (3) Protecting Illinois persons from discrimination 13    and unfair, deceptive, and abusive acts and practices in 14    connection with financial practices and services.15        (4) Promoting nondiscriminatory protective innovation 16    in financial products and services. 17    Section 1-15. Unlawful, unfair, deceptive, or abusive 18acts. 19    (a) It is unlawful for a regulated person to do any of the 20following:21        (1) Engage, have engaged, or propose to engage in any 22    unlawful, unfair, deceptive, or abusive act or practice 23    with respect to financial products or services.24        (2) Offer or provide to a consumer any financial 25    product or service not in conformity with any financial   SB1512- 8 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    law or otherwise commit any act or omission in violation 2    of a financial law.3        (3) Fail or refuse, as required by a financial law or 4    any rule or order issued by the Department under this Act, 5    to do any of the following:6            (A) Permit the Department access to or copying of 7        records.8            (B) Establish or maintain records.9            (C) Make reports or provide information to the 10        Department.11    (b) For any person who provides substantial assistance to 12a regulated person in violation of subsection (a) or any rule 13or order issued under that provision, the provider of that 14substantial assistance shall be deemed to be in violation of 15that provision, rule, or order to the same extent as the person 16to whom that assistance is provided.17    (c) Notwithstanding subsection (b), a person shall not be 18held to have violated paragraph (1) of subsection (a) solely 19by virtue of providing or selling advertising time or space to 20a regulated person. 21    Section 1-20. Employee protection against retaliation. 22    (a) A regulated person shall not terminate or in any other 23way discriminate or retaliate against, or cause to be 24terminated or discriminated or retaliated against, any 25employee or any authorized representative of covered employees   SB1512- 9 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1by reason of the fact that the employee or representative, 2whether at the initiative of the employee or in the ordinary 3course of the duties of the employee, or any person acting 4pursuant to a request of the employee, has either:5        (1) Filed or instituted, or caused to be filed or 6    instituted, any proceeding under any financial law.7        (2) Objected to, refused to participate in, or 8    reported to the Department any activity, policy, practice, 9    or assigned task that the employee or other such person 10    reasonably believed to be in violation of any law, rule, 11    order, standard, or prohibition, subject to the 12    jurisdiction of, or enforceable by, the Department.13    (b) A violation of this Section is enforceable as a 14violation of the Whistleblower Act. 15    (c) This Section does not restrict the remedies available 16under this Act.  17    Section 1-25. Exemptions. 18    (a) This Act shall not apply to any financial product or 19service for which registration, chartering, licensing, or any 20other express authorization is required by any State agency or 21department of State government, other than by the Department, 22but only to the extent the financial product or service is 23actually regulated for the purpose of consumer or investor 24protection by such State agency or department of State 25government.   SB1512- 10 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    (b) Products or services shall not be exempt from this Act 2solely because of the following:3        (1) they are subject to other general laws or 4    regulations for the protection of consumers or investors;5        (2) they are subject to the Motor Vehicle Retail 6    Installment Sales Act; or7        (3) they are subject to the Retail Installment Sales 8    Act. 9Article 5. Administration 10    Section 5-5. General powers and duties. 11    (a) The Department shall regulate the offering and 12provision of financial products or services under Illinois 13financial laws, unless exempt pursuant to Section 1-25. To the 14extent permissible under federal financial laws, the 15Department shall exercise nonexclusive oversight and 16enforcement under the federal financial laws.17    (b) The Department shall have the functions, powers, and 18duties as are conferred by this Act, the Division of Banking 19Act, the Financial Institutions Act, and any other law 20relating to the Department. To the extent of any inconsistency 21between functions, powers, and duties granted to the 22Department in this Act and the Division of Banking Act, the 23Financial Institutions Act, and any other law, this Act shall 24control. The functions, powers, and duties granted to the   SB1512- 11 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1Department in the Division of Banking Act, the Financial 2Institutions Act, and any other law shall not be deemed as 3inconsistent with this Act so long as they give more 4protection to consumers or competition.5    (c) The Department shall have the following functions, 6powers, and duties in carrying out its responsibilities under 7this Act and any other financial law under the jurisdiction of 8or enforceable by the Department:9        (1) to issue or refuse to issue any license, 10    registration, charter, certificate, or other 11    authorization;12        (2) to revoke or suspend for cause any license, 13    registration, charter, certificate, or other 14    authorization;15        (3) to keep records of all licenses, registrations, 16    charters, or other authorizations;17        (4) to receive, consider, investigate, and act upon 18    complaints made by any person relating to a regulated 19    person;20        (5) to prescribe the forms of and receive: 21            (A) applications for licenses, registrations, 22        charters, or other authorizations; and 23            (B) all reports and all books and records required 24        to be made by any regulated persons;25        (6) to subpoena documents and witnesses and compel 26    their attendance and production, to administer oaths, and   SB1512- 12 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    to require the production of any books, papers, or other 2    materials relevant to any inquiry authorized by this Act 3    or other financial law under the jurisdiction of or 4    enforceable by the Department;5        (7) to issue orders against any person: 6            (A) if the Secretary has reasonable cause to 7        believe that an unsafe, unsound, or unlawful practice 8        has occurred, is occurring, or is about to occur; 9            (B) if any person has violated, is violating, or 10        is about to violate any law, rule, or written 11        agreement with the Secretary; or 12            (C) for the purpose of administering the 13        provisions of this Act or other financial law and any 14        rule adopted in accordance with this Act or other 15        financial law;16        (8) to address any inquiries to any regulated person, 17    or the directors, officers, or employees of the regulated 18    person, in relation to the regulated person's activities 19    and conditions or any other matter connected with its 20    affairs, and it shall be the duty of any person so 21    addressed to promptly reply in writing to those inquiries; 22    the Secretary may also require reports from any regulated 23    person at any time the Secretary chooses;24        (9) to examine the books and records of every 25    regulated person;26        (10) to enforce the provisions of this Act and   SB1512- 13 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    Illinois and federal financial laws under the jurisdiction 2    of or enforceable by the Department;3        (11) to levy fees, fines, civil penalties, charges for 4    services, and assessments to defray operating expenses, 5    including direct and indirect costs, of administering this 6    Act and other financial laws under the jurisdiction of or 7    enforceable by the Department; 8        (12) to appoint examiners, supervisors, experts, and 9    special assistants as needed to effectively and 10    efficiently administer this Act and other financial laws 11    under the jurisdiction of or enforceable by the 12    Department;13        (13) to conduct hearings for the purpose of carrying 14    out the purposes of this Act;15        (14) to exercise visitorial power over a regulated 16    person; 17        (15) to enter into cooperative agreements with federal 18    and State regulatory authorities and to accept reports of 19    examinations from federal and State regulatory 20    authorities;21        (16) to assign on an emergency basis an examiner or 22    examiners to monitor the affairs of a regulated person 23    with whatever frequency the Secretary determines 24    appropriate and to charge the regulated person for 25    reasonable and necessary expenses of the Secretary if in 26    the opinion of the Secretary an emergency exists or   SB1512- 14 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    appears likely to occur;2        (17) to impose civil penalties against a regulated 3    person for failing to respond to a regulatory request or 4    reporting requirement; 5        (18) to conduct investigations, market surveillance, 6    and research, studies, and analyses of matters affecting 7    the interests of users of financial products and services;8        (19) to protect users of financial products and 9    services, including by:10            (A) initiating and encouraging consumer and 11        investor financial education programs and 12        disseminating materials to educate users of financial 13        products and services;14            (B) developing and implementing outreach and 15        education programs to underserved consumers, 16        investors, and communities;17            (C) providing technical assistance to federal 18        regulatory agencies, other State agencies or 19        departments of State government, units of local 20        government, law enforcement, and not-for-profits in 21        the development of consumer and investor protection 22        measures with respect to financial products and 23        services;24            (D) continuing and expanding the detection, 25        investigation, and prevention of fraud, money 26        laundering, terrorist financing, and other financial   SB1512- 15 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1        crimes; and2            (E) taking such actions as the Secretary deems 3        necessary to educate and protect users of financial 4        products and services;5        (20) to develop and implement initiatives and programs 6    to promote innovation, competition, and access to 7    financial products and services; and8        (21) to perform any other lawful acts necessary or 9    desirable to carry out the purposes and provisions of this 10    Act and other financial laws.11    (d) The Department is authorized and encouraged to share 12any information obtained pursuant to this Act or any other law 13under the jurisdiction of or enforceable by the Department 14with law enforcement officials or other regulatory agencies.15    (e) The Secretary may establish such divisions, bureaus, 16and other units within the Department as may be necessary for 17the administration of the financial laws, and the proper 18exercise of his or her powers and the performance of his or her 19duties under those laws, and may, from time to time, 20reorganize, consolidate, or abolish such divisions, bureaus, 21or other units within the Department. Notwithstanding any 22inconsistent provision of law, the Secretary may determine the 23official functions of each division, bureau, or other unit 24within the Department. Except as may be otherwise provided by 25the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Personnel Code, 26or other applicable law, there shall be a head of each   SB1512- 16 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1division, bureau, or other unit to be appointed by the 2Secretary, who shall serve at the pleasure of the Secretary. 3    Section 5-10. Funds. 4    (a) All moneys collected or received by the Department 5under this Act shall be deposited into the Financial 6Protection Fund, which is hereby created. The amounts 7deposited into the Financial Protection Fund shall be used for 8the ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department in 9administering this Act and other financial laws; nothing in 10this Act shall prevent the continuation of the practice of 11paying expenses involving salaries, retirement, social 12security, and State-paid insurance of State officers and 13employees by appropriation from the General Revenue Fund or 14any other fund. Moneys deposited into the Financial Protection 15Fund may be transferred to the Professions Indirect Cost Fund 16or any other Department fund.17    (b) The Department may set and collect an annual or 18quarterly assessment fee for each person required to register 19pursuant to Section 10-5, which may be scaled based on the size 20or market participation of the person. The assessment fee 21shall be limited to the reasonable regulatory costs under this 22Act incident to issuing registrations and performing 23investigations, inspections, examinations, audits, and 24supervisory activities; and the administrative enforcement and 25adjudication of the Department with respect to registrants.   SB1512- 17 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1The regulatory costs for the administrative enforcement of 2this Act are for the purposes of protecting consumers against 3unfair, deceptive, or abusive acts or practices in connection 4with any transaction involving the provision of financial 5products and services in this State; protecting registrants 6against unfair competition; improving accountability and 7transparency; and ensuring equitable enforcement of the 8financial laws. The cost of every inspection and examination 9of a regulated person conducted under the authority of this 10Act shall be paid to the Department by the regulated person 11examined and the Department may maintain an action for 12recovery of those costs in any court of competent 13jurisdiction. Nothing in this subsection shall alter or 14supersede the requirements for the cost of an examination 15conducted under the authority of any other law administered by 16the Department.17    (c) For each fiscal year commencing on or after the 18effective date of this Act, assessments to defray operating 19expenses, including all direct and indirect costs, of the 20Department in administering the financial laws, except 21expenses incurred in the administration of the Illinois 22Banking Act, the Savings Bank Act, the Corporate Fiduciary 23Act, and the Illinois Credit Union Act, may be assessed by the 24Department in accordance with this subsection. The Department 25may adopt rules to set and collect annual or quarterly 26assessment fees to defray operating expenses of administering   SB1512- 18 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1each financial law, which shall be borne by and assessed 2against the person regulated by each financial law, and which 3may be scaled based on the size or market participation of such 4regulated persons. Nothing in this subsection shall limit the 5existing authority of the Department to levy fees, fines, 6civil penalties, charges, and assessments under other 7financial laws.8    (d) Fees and assessments paid pursuant to this Section are 9nonrefundable. 10Article 10. Supervision 11    Section 10-5. Registration requirements. 12    (a) The Department may adopt rules regarding registration 13requirements applicable to a regulated person engaged in the 14business of offering or providing a financial product or 15service, including, but not limited to, requiring a filing to 16be made under oath and requiring the payment of assessment 17fees. The Department may require registration through the 18Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry or a 19provider of another multi-state licensing system.20    (b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the Department shall 21not require the registration by any of the following:22        (1) A regulated person who is regulated by the 23    Department under another law and who is providing a 24    financial product or service within the scope of that   SB1512- 19 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    other law.2        (2) A regulated person who is licensed or registered 3    by another State agency or department of State government, 4    other than the Department, unless the regulated person is 5    offering or providing a financial product or service that 6    is not regulated by the other agency.7    (c) The following procedures apply to the oversight of 8persons required to register under subsection (a):9        (1) The Department may adopt rules to facilitate 10    oversight of regulated persons and assessment and 11    detection of risks to consumers.12        (2) The Department may require a regulated person to 13    generate, provide, or retain records for the purposes of 14    facilitating oversight of those persons and assessing and 15    detecting risks to consumers.16        (3) The Department may adopt rules regarding a 17    regulated person to ensure that such persons are 18    legitimate entities and are able to perform their 19    obligations to consumers. Such rules may include 20    background checks for principals, officers, directors, or 21    key personnel and bonding or other appropriate financial 22    and safety and soundness requirements. 23    Section 10-10. Consumer protection. 24    (a) The Department may adopt rules applicable to any 25regulated person identifying as unlawful, unfair, deceptive,   SB1512- 20 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1or abusive acts or practices in connection with any 2transaction for a financial product or service, or the 3offering of a financial product or service. Rules adopted 4pursuant to this subsection may include requirements for the 5purpose of preventing those acts or practices.6    (b) The Department may adopt rules applicable to any 7regulated person to ensure that the features of any financial 8product or service, both initially and over the term of the 9product or service, are fully, accurately, and effectively 10disclosed to persons in a manner that permits persons to 11understand the costs, benefits, and risks associated with the 12product or service in light of the facts and circumstances.13    (c) In conducting any monitoring, regulatory, or 14supervision activity, the Department may gather information 15from time to time regarding the organization, business 16conduct, markets, and activities of any regulated person. 17    (d) The Department may require any regulated person to 18file with the Department, under oath or otherwise, in a form 19and within a reasonable period of time as the Department may 20order, annual reports, special reports, or answers in writing 21to specific questions, as necessary for the Department to 22fulfill its monitoring, regulatory, supervision, and reporting 23responsibilities.24    (e) To clarify the applicability of State credit cost 25limitations, including rate and fee caps, to the offering and 26provision of financial products and services by a regulated   SB1512- 21 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1person, the Department may interpret and implement, including 2to prevent evasion, all Illinois credit cost provisions as to 3their applicability to financial products and services. 4Nothing in this subsection (e) shall be construed to give the 5Department authority to establish a usury limit applicable to 6an extension of credit offered or made by a regulated person to 7a person except as otherwise provided for by law.  8    Section 10-15. Cybersecurity. 9    (a) Each entity covered by this Section shall maintain a 10cybersecurity program that is consistent with any applicable 11federal and State laws and any rules adopted by the 12Department. It is unlawful for a covered entity to fail to 13comply with any requirement of this Section or any rule 14adopted by the Department. At a minimum, and subject to any 15rules adopted by the Department, each covered entity shall:16        (1) Maintain a cybersecurity program designed to 17    protect the confidentiality, integrity, and availability 18    of the covered entity's information systems and nonpublic 19    information stored on those information systems.20        (2) Implement and maintain a written policy or 21    policies, approved at least annually by a senior officer 22    or the covered entity's board of directors, an appropriate 23    committee thereof, or an equivalent governing body, 24    setting forth the covered entity's policies and procedures 25    for the protection of its information systems and   SB1512- 22 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    nonpublic information stored on those information systems.2        (3) Designate a qualified individual responsible for 3    overseeing and implementing the covered entity's 4    cybersecurity program and enforcing its cybersecurity 5    policy or policies. The individual must have adequate 6    authority to ensure cybersecurity risks are appropriately 7    managed, including the ability to direct sufficient 8    resources to implement and maintain a cybersecurity 9    program. The individual may be employed by the covered 10    entity, one of its affiliates, or a service provider.11    (b) To assist in carrying out this Section, the Department 12may adopt rules to define terms used in this Section and to 13establish specific requirements for the cybersecurity program 14required by subsection (a), including, but not limited to, 15rules related to: 16        (1) penetration testing and vulnerability assessment; 17        (2) audit trails;18        (3) access privileges; 19        (4) application security; 20        (5) risk assessment; 21        (6) cybersecurity personnel and intelligence; 22        (7) affiliates and service providers; 23        (8) authentication;24        (9) data retention; 25        (10) training and monitoring; 26        (11) encryption;   SB1512- 23 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1        (12) incident response; 2        (13) notice of cybersecurity events; and 3        (14) any other requirement necessary and appropriate 4    for the protection of consumers, for the safety and 5    soundness of the covered entity, or to effectuate the 6    purposes of this Section.7    (c) Each covered entity shall notify the Department 8electronically as promptly as possible but in no event later 9than 72 hours after a determination that a cybersecurity event 10has occurred that is any of the following: 11        (1) cybersecurity events impacting the covered entity 12    of which notice is required to be provided to any 13    government body, self-regulatory agency, or any other 14    supervisory body; 15        (2) cybersecurity events that have a reasonable 16    likelihood of materially harming, disrupting, or degrading 17    any material part of the normal operations of the covered 18    entity; 19        (3) cybersecurity events where an unauthorized user 20    has gained access to a privileged account; 21        (4) cybersecurity events that resulted in the 22    deployment of ransomware within a material part of the 23    covered entity's information system; or 24        (5) other cybersecurity events as defined by the 25    Department by rule. 26    Within a reasonable period of time as the Department may   SB1512- 24 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1adopt by rule or by order, each covered entity shall provide 2the Department electronically any information requested 3regarding the investigation of the cybersecurity event. 4Covered entities shall have a continuing obligation to update 5and supplement the information provided.6    (d) As used in this Section, "covered entity" or "entity 7covered by this Section" means a regulated person that is not 8an individual who is operating under or required to operate 9under a license, registration, charter, certificate, or other 10authorization under a financial law administered by the 11Department. 12    Section 10-20. Anti-fraud and anti-money laundering. 13    (a) It is unlawful for a regulated person to do any of the 14following:15        (1) Commit any fraud or misrepresentation with respect 16    to a financial product or service or involving any person 17    offering to provide or providing financial products or 18    services.19        (2) Fail to establish and maintain a program to guard 20    against fraud, scams, and unauthorized transactions 21    against consumers involving the regulated person's 22    financial products or services, consistent with any 23    applicable federal and State laws and any rules adopted by 24    the Department.25    Nothing in this subsection shall affect the construction   SB1512- 25 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1or interpretation of the term "fraud" as it is used in any 2other provision of State law.3    (b) In order to guard against money laundering and 4terrorist financing, entities covered by this subsection shall 5establish and maintain an anti-money laundering and countering 6the financing of terrorism program that complies with 7applicable federal anti-money laundering laws and regulations. 8Each covered entity shall also comply with applicable federal 9regulations issued by the Office of Foreign Assets Control of 10the United States Department of the Treasury, 31 CFR Part 500. 11It is unlawful for a covered entity to fail to comply with any 12requirement of this subsection or any rule adopted by the 13Department. As used in this subsection, "covered entity" or 14"entity covered by this subsection" means a bank, credit 15union, money transmitter, or other person regulated by the 16Department that is subject to applicable federal anti-money 17laundering laws, 31 U.S.C. Chapter 53, Subchapter II.18    (c) Whenever the Department is satisfied that a violation 19subject to this Section or other criminal activity under the 20financial laws has been committed or attempted, the Department 21shall report any such violation of law, as the Department 22deems appropriate, to the relevant law enforcement or 23regulatory agencies, the Attorney General, or the State's 24Attorney of the county in which any such violation occurs. 25Article 15. Enforcement   SB1512- 26 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    Section 15-5. Subpoena and investigatory powers. 2    (a) The Department, by its Secretary or a person 3designated by him or her, is empowered, at any time during the 4course of any investigation, examination, or hearing conducted 5pursuant to this Act to administer oaths, subpoena witnesses, 6take evidence, and compel the production of any books, papers, 7records, or any other documents that the Secretary or a person 8designated by him or her deems relevant or material to any such 9investigation, examination, or hearing conducted by the 10Department, with the same fees and mileage and in the same 11manner as prescribed by law in judicial proceedings in civil 12cases in circuit courts of this State. 13    (b) The Secretary may require regulated persons to file 14written reports or written answers to questions.15    (c) Any person who, without lawful authority, fails to 16appear in response to a subpoena or to answer any question or 17produce any books, papers, records, or any other documents 18relevant or material to the investigation or hearing is guilty 19of a Class A misdemeanor. Each violation shall constitute a 20separate and distinct offense.21    (d) In addition to initiating criminal proceedings through 22referral, the Department, through the Attorney General or 23State's Attorney of the county in which any such violation 24occurs, may seek civil enforcement of any such subpoena by any 25circuit court of this State.   SB1512- 27 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    Section 15-10. Enforcement powers. 2    (a) The Department may take any action authorized by this 3law against a regulated person who engages, has engaged, or 4proposes to engage in unfair, deceptive, or abusive practices 5with respect to consumer financial products or services.6    (b) The Department may take any action authorized by this 7law against a regulated person for any violation of this Act or 8any financial law applicable to such regulated person or for 9any unsafe, unsound, or unlawful practice by such regulated 10person. Violations of this Act by a regulated person 11constitute both a violation of this Act and a violation of the 12financial law under which such regulated person is licensed, 13registered, chartered, authorized, or otherwise regulated by 14the Department.15    (c) Relief under this Section may include, but is not 16limited to, any of the following:17        (1) Rescission or reformation of contracts.18        (2) Refund of moneys or return of real property.19        (3) Restitution.20        (4) Disgorgement or compensation for unjust 21    enrichment, with any disgorged amounts returned to the 22    affected consumers, to the extent practicable.23        (5) Payment of damages or other monetary relief.24        (6) Public notification regarding the violation, 25    including the costs of notification.  SB1512- 28 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1        (7) Limits on the activities or functions of the 2    person.3        (8) Monetary penalties, as set forth in subsection 4    (d).5    (d) In any administrative action brought pursuant to this 6Act, the following penalties shall apply:7        (1) Any person that violates, through any act or 8    omission, any provision of this Act shall forfeit and pay 9    a penalty pursuant to this subsection.10            (A) The penalty amounts are as follows:11                (i) For any violation of this Act or a rule, 12            order, or condition imposed in writing by the 13            Department, a penalty may not exceed the greater 14            of $5,000 for each day during which the violation 15            or failure to pay continues or $2,500 for each act 16            or omission in violation.17                (ii) Notwithstanding subdivision (i), for any 18            reckless violation by a person of this Act or a 19            rule, order, or condition imposed by the 20            Department, a penalty may not exceed the greater 21            of $25,000 for each day during which the violation 22            continues or $10,000 for each act or omission in 23            violation.24                (iii) Notwithstanding subdivision (i) or (ii), 25            for any knowing violation by a person of this Act 26            or a rule, order, or condition imposed by the   SB1512- 29 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1            Department, a penalty may not exceed the lesser of 2            1% of the person's total assets, $1,000,000 for 3            each day during which the violation continues, or 4            $25,000 for each act or omission in violation.5            (B) In determining the amount of any penalty 6        assessed under this Act, the Department shall take 7        into account mitigating factors and the 8        appropriateness of the penalty with respect to all of 9        the following:10                (i) The amount of financial resources of the 11            person charged.12                (ii) The good faith of the person charged.13                (iii) The gravity of the violation.14                (iv) The severity of the risks to or losses of 15            the consumer, which may take into account the 16            number of products or services sold or provided.17                (v) The history of previous violations.18                (vi) Other facts and circumstances as justice 19            may require.20        (2) The Department may compromise, modify, or remit 21    any penalty that may be assessed or has already been 22    assessed.23        (3) Penalties may be imposed to deter future 24    violations by the regulated person or other regulated 25    persons.    SB1512- 30 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    Section 15-15. Civil actions. 2    (a) If a person violates any provision of this Act, or a 3rule, order, or condition imposed in writing by the 4Department, the Department through the Attorney General or the 5State's Attorney of the county in which any such violation 6occurs may bring an action in the circuit court to enjoin the 7acts or practices or to enforce compliance with this Act or any 8rule or order adopted pursuant to this Act. Upon a proper 9showing, a permanent or preliminary injunction, restraining 10order, or writ of mandate shall be granted and a receiver, 11monitor, conservator, or other designated fiduciary or officer 12of the court may be appointed for the defendant or the 13defendant's assets, or any other ancillary relief may be 14granted as appropriate. A receiver, monitor, conservator, or 15other designated fiduciary or officer of the court appointed 16by the circuit court pursuant to this Section may, with the 17approval of the court, exercise any or all of the powers of the 18defendant's officers, directors, partners, trustees, or 19persons who exercise similar powers and perform similar 20duties, including the filing of a petition for bankruptcy. No 21action at law or in equity may be maintained by any party 22against the Secretary, a receiver, monitor, conservator, or 23other designated fiduciary or officer of the court, by reason 24of their exercising these powers or performing these duties 25pursuant to the order of, or with the approval of, the circuit 26court.  SB1512- 31 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    (b) The Secretary may include in any action relief 2authorized by Section 15-10. The circuit court shall have 3jurisdiction to award additional relief.4    (c) In any action brought by the Department, the 5Department may recover its costs and attorney's fees in 6connection with prosecuting the action if the Department is 7the prevailing party in the action. 8    Section 15-20. Limitations on actions. 9    (a) Except as otherwise permitted by law or equity, 10including provisions under any financial law, no civil action 11may be brought under this Act more than 5 years after the date 12of discovery of the violation to which an action relates.13    (b) In any action arising solely under an Illinois or 14federal financial law:15        (1) The limitations period under that financial law 16    shall apply, and not the period under subsection (a).17        (2) The Department may commence, defend, or intervene 18    in the action in accordance with the requirements of that 19    provision of law, as applicable. 20    Section 15-25. Hearings and adjudication proceedings. 21    (a) The Department may conduct hearings and adjudication 22proceedings with respect to any person in order to ensure or 23enforce compliance with the following:24        (1) The provisions of this Act, including any rule,   SB1512- 32 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    order, or condition imposed by the Department under this 2    Act.3        (2) Any other law that the Department is authorized to 4    enforce and any rules, regulations, or orders adopted 5    pursuant to that law, unless that law specifically limits 6    the Department from conducting a hearing or adjudication 7    proceeding and only to the extent of that limitation.8    (b) All hearings provided for in this Act shall be 9conducted in accordance with 38 Ill. Adm. Code 100 and the 10Secretary shall have all the powers granted therein.11    (c) The Department may, by order, assess penalties under 12subsection (d) of Section 15-10. If that person fails to file a 13written request for a hearing within 30 days after the date of 14service of the order, the order shall be deemed a final order 15of the Secretary.16    (d)(1) If, in the opinion of the Department, any person 17engages, has engaged, or proposes to engage in any activity 18prohibited by Sections 1-15 or 1-20, any unsafe, unsound, or 19unlawful practice, or any activity, act, practice, or course 20of business that violates a law, rule, order, or any condition 21imposed in writing on the person by the Department, the 22Department may issue an order directing the person to cease 23and desist and refrain from engaging in the activity, act, 24practice, or course of business.25        (2) If that person fails to file a written request for 26    a hearing within 30 days after the date of service of the   SB1512- 33 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    order, the order shall be deemed a final order of the 2    Secretary.3    (e) If any person engages, has engaged, or proposes to 4engage in any activity prohibited by Sections 1-15 or 1-20, 5any unsafe, unsound, or unlawful practice, or any activity, 6act, practice, or course of business that violates a law, 7rule, order, or any condition imposed in writing on the person 8by the Department, the Department may include in any 9administrative action authorized under this Section a claim 10for ancillary relief as set forth in subsection (c) of Section 1115-10. The court shall have jurisdiction to award additional 12relief.13    (f) If, in the opinion of the Department, any regulated 14person engages, has engaged, or proposes to engage in any 15unsafe, unsound, or unlawful practice or any activity, act, 16practice, or course of business that violates a law, rule, 17order, or any condition imposed in writing on the person by the 18Department, the Department may, after notice and an 19opportunity for a hearing, suspend or revoke the license or 20registration of the regulated person. If that person fails to 21file a written request for a hearing within 30 days after the 22date of service of the order, the order shall be deemed a final 23order of the Secretary.24    (g) An order of the Department shall be served upon every 25person or corporation to be affected thereby by personal 26delivery of a copy of the order by mail, or, at the discretion   SB1512- 34 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1of the Department, by electronic means to an email address 2specified by the person or corporation with the Department. 3Mailing in the United States mail as herein provided shall 4constitute service without additional proof of a receipt of 5such copy or copies of such order.6    (h) After the exhaustion of the review procedures provided 7for in this Section, the Secretary may apply to the 8appropriate circuit court for an order compelling the cited 9person to comply with the orders of the Secretary.10        (1) The application shall include a copy of the final 11    order of the Secretary.12        (2) Upon the filing of the application, the circuit 13    court shall set a date for a hearing for an order to show 14    cause why judgment should not be entered, which shall be 15    set not less than 30 calendar days after the date the 16    application is filed.17        (3) The Secretary shall serve a copy of the 18    application and final order along with notice of the 19    hearing to all entities or persons cited in the order 20    against whom a civil judgment is sought not less than 15 21    calendar days before the date set for the hearing. Service 22    of the application shall be pursuant to the methods 23    specified by Part 2 of the Civil Practice Law for service 24    of summons.25        (4) The court shall consider the filing of a copy of 26    the final order of the Secretary and the proof of service   SB1512- 35 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    of the application and notice of the hearing on the 2    persons or entities against whom the judgment is sought as 3    a sufficient prima facie showing to warrant the issuance 4    of the civil judgment and order at the hearing. The 5    respondent bears the burden of showing by affirmative 6    evidence at the hearing why the order of the Secretary is 7    not final or why the timely notice of application and 8    hearing was not provided to avoid judgment being entered 9    by the circuit court. 10        (5) The respondent shall not be allowed to raise any 11    defenses or present any evidence at the hearing, an 12    appeal, or writ from such proceedings on the application 13    that had been or could have been raised by the respondent 14    at an administrative hearing to challenge the Secretary's 15    order.16        (6) The judgment issued pursuant to paragraph (4) of 17    this subsection may be for injunctive relief or payment of 18    ancillary relief or penalties. The judgment may be 19    enforced by the court pursuant to the procedures 20    authorized for any other civil judgment. 21    Section 15-30. Hearing rules. 22    (a) The Department may, in accordance with the Illinois 23Administrative Procedure Act, adopt rules to provide for 24review within the Department of the Secretary's decisions 25affecting the rights of persons or entities under this Act.   SB1512- 36 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1The review shall provide for, at a minimum:2        (1) appointment of a hearing officer;3        (2) appropriate procedural rules, specific deadlines 4    for filings, and standards of evidence and of proof; and5        (3) provision for apportioning costs among parties to 6    the appeal.7    (b) All final administrative decisions of the Department 8under this Act, all amendments and modifications of final 9administrative decisions, and any rules adopted by the 10Department pursuant to this Act shall be subject to judicial 11review pursuant to the provisions of the Administrative Review 12Law. 13    Section 15-35. No construed restrictions on Secretary or 14other officials. 15    (a) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to restrict the 16exercise of powers or the performance of the duties of the 17Secretary that he or she is authorized to exercise or perform 18by another law.19    (b) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to restrict the 20exercise of powers or the performance of the duties of the 21Attorney General or any other governmental official that he or 22she is authorized to exercise or perform by law. 23Article 20. Additional Procedural Provisions   SB1512- 37 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    Section 20-5. Confidential supervisory information. 2    (a) Information or documents obtained by employees, 3agents, or representatives of the Department in the course of 4any examination, investigation, audit, visit, registration, 5certification, review, licensing, investigation, or any other 6regulatory activity pursuant this Act and any record prepared 7or obtained by the Department to the extent that the record 8summarizes or contains information derived from any report, 9document, or record described in this Section shall, unless 10made a matter of public record, be deemed confidential and not 11subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act, 12and only subject to disclosure pursuant to subpoena or court 13order as provided in subsection (e). 14    (b) All records of communications or summaries of 15communications between employees, agents, or representatives 16of the Department and employees, agents, or representatives of 17other governmental agencies, a provider of any multi-state 18licensing system, or associations or organizations 19representing federal, State, or local law enforcement or 20regulatory agencies or providers of any multi-state licensing 21system, pursuant to any regulatory or supervision activity 22under this Act and any other financial law under the 23jurisdiction of or enforceable by the Department, are 24confidential to the extent they contain confidential 25supervisory information and not subject to disclosure under 26the Freedom of Information Act.   SB1512- 38 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    (c) All confidential supervisory information received from 2other governmental agencies, a multi-state licensing system 3provider, or associations or organizations consisting of 4employees, agents, or representatives of such agencies or 5providers, shall not be subject to disclosure under the 6Freedom of Information Act, and only subject to disclosure 7pursuant to subpoena or court order as provided in subsection 8(e).9    (d) The sharing of any confidential supervisory 10information under this Act with governmental agencies, 11providers of any multi-state licensing system, or associations 12or organizations consisting of employees, agents, or 13representatives of such federal, State, or local law 14enforcement or regulatory agencies, shall not result in the 15loss of privilege arising under federal or State law, or the 16loss of confidentiality protections provided by federal law or 17State law, and are only subject to disclosure pursuant to 18subpoena or court order as provided in subsection (e).19    (e) Confidential supervisory information may not be 20disclosed to anyone other than the regulated person, law 21enforcement officials or other regulatory agencies that have 22an appropriate regulatory interest as determined by the 23Secretary, or to a party presenting a lawful subpoena, order, 24or other judicial or administrative process to the Secretary. 25The Secretary may immediately appeal to the court of 26jurisdiction the disclosure of such confidential supervisory   SB1512- 39 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1information and seek a stay of the subpoena pending the 2outcome of the appeal. Reports required of regulated persons 3by the Secretary under this Act and results of examinations 4performed by the Secretary under this Act shall be the 5property of only the Secretary but may be shared with the 6regulated person. Access under this Act to the books and 7records of each regulated person shall be limited to the 8Secretary and his or her agents as provided in this Act and to 9the regulated person and its authorized agents and designees. 10No other person shall have access to the books and records of a 11regulated person under this Act. Any person upon whom a demand 12for production of confidential supervisory information is 13made, whether by subpoena, order, or other judicial or 14administrative process, must withhold production of the 15confidential supervisory information and must notify the 16Secretary of the demand, at which time the Secretary is 17authorized to intervene for the purpose of enforcing the 18limitations of this Section or seeking the withdrawal or 19termination of the attempt to compel production of the 20confidential supervisory information. The Secretary may impose 21any conditions and limitations on the disclosure of 22confidential supervisory information that are necessary to 23protect the confidentiality of such information. Except as 24authorized by the Secretary, no person obtaining access to 25confidential supervisory information may make a copy of the 26confidential supervisory information. The Secretary may   SB1512- 40 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1condition a decision to disclose confidential supervisory 2information on entry of a protective order by the court or 3administrative tribunal presiding in the particular case or on 4a written agreement of confidentiality. In a case in which a 5protective order or agreement has already been entered between 6parties other than the Secretary, the Secretary may 7nevertheless condition approval for release of confidential 8supervisory information upon the inclusion of additional or 9amended provisions in the protective order. The Secretary may 10authorize a party who obtained the records for use in one case 11to provide them to another party in another case, subject to 12any conditions that the Secretary may impose on either or both 13parties. The requester shall promptly notify other parties to 14a case of the release of confidential supervisory information 15obtained and, upon entry of a protective order, shall provide 16copies of confidential supervisory information to the other 17parties.18    (f) The Secretary is authorized to enter agreements or 19sharing arrangements with other governmental agencies, 20providers of any multi-state licensing system, or associations 21or organizations representing governmental agencies or 22providers of any multi-state licensing system. Notwithstanding 23the foregoing, the provisions of this Section shall apply 24regardless of the existence of any such agreement or sharing 25arrangement.26    (g) This Section in no way limits any right, privilege, or   SB1512- 41 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1authority that the Department has pursuant to any other 2applicable law. This Section does not in any way limit any 3privilege arising under federal or State law or other 4exemption from disclosure pursuant to the Freedom of 5Information Act.6    (h) Notwithstanding the foregoing, whenever the Secretary 7determines, in his or her sole discretion, that it is in the 8public's interest, he or she may publicly disclose information 9or documents obtained under this Act and any other financial 10law under the jurisdiction of or enforceable by the 11Department, unless otherwise prohibited by law. 12    Section 20-10. Additional rulemaking authority. 13    (a) In addition to such powers and rulemaking authority as 14may be prescribed elsewhere in this Act or other financial 15laws under the jurisdiction of or enforceable by the 16Department, the Secretary is hereby authorized and empowered 17to adopt rules consistent with the purposes of this Act, 18including, but not limited to:19        (1) rules in connection with the activities of 20    regulated persons as may be necessary and appropriate for 21    the protection of consumers in this State;22        (2) rules to define the terms used in this Act and as 23    may be necessary and appropriate to interpret and 24    implement the provisions of this Act;25        (3) rules as may be necessary for the administration   SB1512- 42 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    and enforcement of this Act;2        (4) rules to set and collect fees necessary to 3    administer and enforce this Act; and4        (5) rules in connection with the activities of 5    regulated persons as may be necessary and appropriate for 6    the safety and soundness of such regulated persons and the 7    stability of the financial system in this State.8    (b) The Secretary is hereby authorized and empowered to 9make specific rulings, demands, and findings that he or she 10deems necessary for the proper conduct of the regulated 11persons.12    (c) The Secretary may adopt rules pursuant to this Act 13upon this Act becoming law with such rules not to take effect 14earlier than January 1, 2026. 15Article 90. 16    Section 90-5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 17changing Section 7.5 as follows: 18    (5 ILCS 140/7.5)19    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 20by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 21exempt from inspection and copying:22        (a) All information determined to be confidential 23    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and   SB1512- 43 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    Development Act.2        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 3    library users with specific materials under the Library 4    Records Confidentiality Act.5        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 6    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 7    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 8    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 9    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 10    has received.11        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 12    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 13    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 14    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 15    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 16    Infection Control Act.17        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 18    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.19        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 20    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 21    Qualifications Based Selection Act.22        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 23    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 24    Tuition Act.25        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 26    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and   SB1512- 44 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 2    general's office that would be exempt if created or 3    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 4    that Act.5        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 6    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 7    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 8    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.9        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 10    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 11    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.12        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 13    or driver identification information compiled by a law 14    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 15    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.16        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 17    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 18    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 19    Prevention Review Team Act.20        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 21    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 22    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 23    authorized under that Article.24        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 25    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 26    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the   SB1512- 45 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 2    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 3    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 4    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.5        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 6    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 7    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.8        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 9    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 10    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 11    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 12    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 13    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Regional 14    Transportation Authority under Section 2.11 of the 15    Regional Transportation Authority Act, or the St. Clair 16    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 17    Act (repealed). 18        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 19    Personnel Record Review Act. 20        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 21    Illinois School Student Records Act. 22        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 23    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 24        (t) (Blank). 25        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 26    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and   SB1512- 46 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 2        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 3    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 4    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 5    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 6    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 7    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 8    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 9    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 10    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 11    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 12        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 13    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 14    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.15        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 16    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 17    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.18        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 19    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 20    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 21        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 22    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 23    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 24    information about the identity and administrative finding 25    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 26    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of   SB1512- 47 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 2    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 3        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 4    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 5    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 6    Act. 7        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 8    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 9        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 10    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 11        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 12    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 13    authorized under that Act.14        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 15    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 16    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 17        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 18    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 19        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 20    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 21        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 22    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 23    Code. 24        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 25    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 26        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure   SB1512- 48 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 2    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 3        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 4    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 5    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 6    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 7    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 8        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 9    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 10        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 11    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 12    Aid Code. 13        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 14    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 15        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 16    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 17        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 18    arising out of a peer support counseling session 19    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 20    Suicide Prevention Act. 21        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 22    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 23    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 24    Prevention Act. 25        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 26    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected   SB1512- 49 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    under the Reproductive Health Act. 2        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 3    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 4        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 5    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 6    Human Rights Act.7        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 8    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 9    Act. 10        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 11    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 12        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 13    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 14    Public Aid Code. 15        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 16    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 17        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 18    information that shall not be made public under the 19    Illinois Insurance Code. 20        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 21    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.22        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 23    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 24        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 25    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 26        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure   SB1512- 50 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 2    Police Act. 3        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 4    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 5    Administrative Code of Illinois. 6        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 7    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 8    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 9    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 10        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 11    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 12    Violence Fatality Review Act. 13        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 14    Act. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 15    July 1, 2025. 16        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 17    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 18    Agency Licensing Act. 19        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 20    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 21    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 22    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 23    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 24    Act. 25        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 26    the School Safety Drill Act.   SB1512- 51 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 2    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 3        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 4    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 5    Act. 6        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 7    2-3.196 of the School Code. 8        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 9    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 10    Power Agency Act. 11        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 12    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 13    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 14        (ooo) (nnn) Data or information provided pursuant to 15    Section 20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment 16    Act. 17        (ppp) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 18    under Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity 19    Act. 20        (qqq) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 21    under Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 22        (rrr) (mmm) Information prohibited from being 23    disclosed under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money 24    Transmission Modernization Act. 25        (sss) (nnn) Information exempt from disclosure under 26    Section 40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.  SB1512- 52 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1        (ttt) Information prohibited from being disclosed 2    under Section 20-5 of the Consumer Financial Protection 3    Law. 4(Source: P.A. 102-36, eff. 6-25-21; 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 5102-292, eff. 1-1-22; 102-520, eff. 8-20-21; 102-559, eff. 68-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-946, eff. 7-1-22; 7102-1042, eff. 6-3-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 103-8, eff. 86-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, 9eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 10103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 117-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, 12eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 8-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 13103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; revised 11-26-24.) 14    Section 90-10. The Financial Institutions Code is amended 15by changing Sections 6 and 6a and by adding Section 18.4 as 16follows: 17    (20 ILCS 1205/6)18    Sec. 6. General powers and duties. In addition to the 19powers and duties provided by law and imposed elsewhere in 20this Act, the Division has the following powers and duties:21        (1) To administer and enforce the Consumer Installment 22    Loan Act and its implementing rules.23        (2) To administer and enforce the Currency Exchange 24    Act and its implementing rules.  SB1512- 53 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1        (3) To administer and enforce the Debt Management 2    Service Act and its implementing rules.3        (4) To administer and enforce the Debt Settlement 4    Consumer Protection Act and its implementing rules.5        (5) To administer and enforce the Illinois Development 6    Credit Corporation Act and its implementing rules.7        (6) To administer and enforce the Payday Loan Reform 8    Act and its implementing rules.9        (7) To administer and enforce the Safety Deposit 10    License Act and its implementing rules.11        (8) To administer and enforce the Sales Finance Agency 12    Act and its implementing rules. 13        (9) To administer and enforce the Title Insurance Act 14    and its implementing rules.15        (10) To administer and enforce the Transmitters of 16    Money Act and its implementing rules.17        (11) To administer and enforce the Predatory Loan 18    Prevention Act and its implementing rules.19        (12) To administer and enforce the Motor Vehicle 20    Retail Installment Sales Act and its implementing rules.21        (13) To administer and enforce the Retail Installment 22    Sales Act and its implementing rules.23        (14) To administer and enforce the Illinois Credit 24    Union Act and its implementing rules.25        (15) To administer and enforce the Collection Agency 26    Act and its implementing rules.  SB1512- 54 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1        (16) To administer and enforce the Consumer Legal 2    Funding Act and its implementing rules. 3        (17) To administer and enforce this Act and any other 4    Act administered by the Director or Division.5        (18) To authorize and administer examinations to 6    ascertain the qualifications of applicants and licensees 7    for which the examination is held.8        (19) To conduct hearings in proceedings to revoke, 9    suspend, refuse to renew, or take other disciplinary 10    action regarding licenses, charters, certifications, 11    registrations, or authorities of persons as authorized in 12    any Act administered by the Division.13        (20) To receive, consider, investigate, and act upon 14    complaints made by any person relating to a regulated 15    person. 16        (21) To keep records of all licenses, registrations, 17    charters, or other authorizations. 18        (22) To issue orders against any person:19            (A) if the Secretary has reasonable cause to 20        believe that an unsafe, unsound, unfit, or unlawful 21        practice has occurred, is occurring, or is likely to 22        occur;23            (B) if any person has violated, is violating, or 24        is about to violate any law, rule, or written 25        agreement with the Secretary; or26            (C) for the purpose of administering the   SB1512- 55 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1        provisions of this Act or other law and any rule 2        adopted in accordance with this Act or other law 3        administered by the Division. 4        (23) To require information or reports from any 5    regulated person at any time the Secretary chooses. 6        (24) To examine the activities, books, and records of 7    every regulated person. 8        (25) To enforce the provisions of this Act, Illinois 9    laws administered by the Division, and the federal laws 10    applicable to persons regulated by the Division. 11        (26) To levy fees, fines, civil penalties, charges for 12    services, and assessments to defray operating expenses, 13    including direct and indirect costs, of administering this 14    Act and other laws administered by the Division. 15        (27) To enter into cooperative agreements with federal 16    and State regulatory authorities and to accept reports of 17    examinations from federal and State regulatory 18    authorities. 19        (28) To exercise visitorial power over regulated 20    persons. 21        (29) To prescribe the forms of and receive (A) 22    applications for licenses, registrations, charters, or 23    other authorizations; and (B) all reports, books, and 24    records required to be made by any licensee. 25        (30) To subpoena documents and witnesses and compel 26    their attendance and production, to administer oaths, and   SB1512- 56 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    to require the production of any books, papers, or other 2    materials relevant to any inquiry authorized by this Act 3    or other law administered by the Division. 4        (31) To appoint examiners, supervisors, experts, and 5    special assistants as needed to administer this Act and 6    other laws administered by the Division. 7        (32) To assign an examiner or examiners to monitor the 8    affairs of a regulated person with whatever frequency the 9    Secretary determines appropriate and to charge the 10    regulated person for reasonable and necessary expenses of 11    the Secretary. 12        (33) To investigate unlicensed activity and take any 13    actions reasonably necessary to prohibit and stop 14    unlicensed activity. 15        (34) To perform any other lawful acts necessary or 16    desirable to carry out the purposes and provisions of this 17    Act and other laws administered by the Division. 18    Whenever the Division is authorized or required by law to 19consider some aspect of criminal history record information 20for the purpose of carrying out its statutory powers and 21responsibilities, then, upon request and payment of fees in 22conformance with the requirements of Section 2605-400 of the 23Illinois State Police Law, the Illinois State Police is 24authorized to furnish, pursuant to positive identification, 25the information contained in State files that is necessary to 26fulfill the request.   SB1512- 57 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 2102-975, eff. 1-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-1014, eff. 38-9-24.) 4    (20 ILCS 1205/6a)  (from Ch. 17, par. 107)5    Sec. 6a. Department rulemaking. 6    (a) In addition to such powers and rulemaking authority as 7may be prescribed elsewhere in this Act or other laws 8administered by the Division, the Department is authorized and 9empowered to adopt rules consistent with the purposes of this 10Act applicable to regulated persons, including, but not 11limited to: 12        (1) rules in connection with the activities of 13    regulated person as may be necessary and appropriate for 14    the protection of consumers in this State; 15        (2) rules to define the terms used in this Act and as 16    may be necessary and appropriate to interpret and 17    implement the provisions of this Act and any other law 18    administered by the Division; 19        (3) rules as may be necessary for the implementation, 20    administration, and enforcement of this Act and any other 21    law administered by the Division; 22        (4) rules to set and collect fees necessary to 23    administer and enforce this Act and any other law 24    administered by the Division, including, but not limited 25    to, fees relating to:   SB1512- 58 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1            (i) investigation of licensees and license 2        applicant fees; 3            (ii) examination fees; 4            (iii) contingent fees; and 5            (iv) such other categories as may be required to 6        administer this Act and any other law administered by 7        the Division; and 8        (5) rules relating to confidential supervisory 9    information. 10    (b) The Secretary is authorized and empowered to make 11specific rulings, demands, and findings that the Secretary 12deems necessary for the proper conduct of regulated persons. 13The Secretary may, in accordance with the Illinois 14Administrative Procedure Act, adopt reasonable rules with 15respect to the administration and enforcement of any Act the 16administration of which is vested in the Division.17(Source: P.A. 103-1014, eff. 8-9-24.) 18    (20 ILCS 1205/18.4 new)19    Sec. 18.4. Character and fitness. To receive and maintain 20any license for any Act administered by the Division, a 21regulated person shall at all times have the character and 22general fitness as to justify the confidence of the public and 23be fit, willing, and able to carry on the proposed business in 24a lawful and fair manner.   SB1512- 59 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    Section 90-20. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 2Section 5.1030 as follows: 3    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)4    Sec. 5.1030. The Financial Protection Fund.  5Article 95. 6    Section 95-5. The Currency Exchange Act is amended by 7changing Sections 4, 14, and 16 as follows: 8    (205 ILCS 405/4)  (from Ch. 17, par. 4808)9    Sec. 4. License application; contents; fees. A licensee 10shall obtain a separate license for each licensed location. 11Application for such license shall be in writing under oath 12and in the form prescribed and furnished by the Secretary. 13Each application shall contain the following:14        (a) The applicant's full name and address (both of 15    residence and place of business) if the applicant is a 16    natural person, and if the applicant is a partnership, 17    limited liability company, or association, of every member 18    thereof, and the name and principal office if the 19    applicant is a corporation;20        (b) The county and municipality, with street and 21    number, if any, where the community currency exchange is 22    to be conducted, if the application is for a community   SB1512- 60 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    currency exchange license;2        (c) If the application is for an ambulatory currency 3    exchange license, the name and address of the employer at 4    each location to be served by it; and5        (d) In the case of a licensee's initial license 6    application, the applicant's occupation or profession; a 7    detailed statement of the applicant's business experience 8    for the 10 years immediately preceding the application; a 9    detailed statement of the applicant's finances; the 10    applicant's present or previous connection with any other 11    currency exchange; whether the applicant has ever been 12    involved in any civil or criminal litigation, and the 13    material facts pertaining thereto; whether the applicant 14    has ever been committed to any penal institution or 15    admitted to an institution for the care and treatment of 16    mentally ill persons; and the nature of applicant's 17    occupancy of the premises to be licensed where the 18    application is for a community currency exchange license. 19    If the applicant is a partnership, the information 20    specified herein shall be required of each partner. If the 21    applicant is a corporation or limited liability company, 22    the said information shall be required of each controlling 23    person thereof along with disclosure of their ownership 24    interests. 25    A licensee's initial community currency exchange license 26application shall be accompanied by a fee of $2,500 $1,000 for   SB1512- 61 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1the cost of investigating the applicant. A licensee's 2application for licenses for additional licensed locations 3shall be accompanied by a fee of $1,000 for each additional 4license. If the ownership of a licensee or licensed location 5changes, in whole or in part, a new application must be filed 6pursuant to this Section along with a $500 fee if the 7licensee's ownership interests have been transferred or sold 8to a new person or entity or a fee of $300 if the licensee's 9ownership interests have been transferred or sold to a current 10holder or holders of the licensee's ownership interests. When 11the application for a community currency exchange license has 12been approved by the Secretary and the applicant so advised, 13an additional sum of $1,000 $400 as an annual license fee for a 14period terminating on the last day of the current calendar 15year shall be paid to the Secretary by the applicant; 16provided, that the license fee for an applicant applying for 17such a license after July 1st of any year shall be $500 $200 18for the balance of such year. Upon receipt of a community 19currency exchange license application, the Secretary shall 20examine the application for completeness and notify the 21applicant in writing of any defect within 20 days after 22receipt. The applicant must remedy the defect within 10 days 23after the mailing of the notification of the defect by the 24Secretary. Failure to timely remedy the defect will void the 25application. Once the Secretary determines that the 26application is complete, the Secretary shall have 90 business   SB1512- 62 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1days to approve or deny the application. If the application is 2denied, the Secretary shall send by United States mail notice 3of the denial to the applicant at the address set forth in the 4application. If an application is denied, the applicant may, 5within 10 days after the date of the notice of denial, make a 6written request to the Secretary for a hearing on the 7application. The hearing shall be set for a date after the 8receipt by the Secretary of the request for a hearing, and 9written notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be 10mailed to the applicant no later than 15 days before the date 11of the hearing. The hearing shall be scheduled for a date 12within 56 days after the date of the receipt of the request for 13a hearing. The applicant shall pay the actual cost of making 14the transcript of the hearing prior to the Secretary's issuing 15his or her decision. The Secretary's decision is subject to 16review as provided in Section 22.01 of this Act.17    An application for an ambulatory currency exchange license 18shall be accompanied by a fee of $3,000 $100, which fee shall 19be for the cost of investigating the applicant. An approved 20applicant shall not be required to pay the initial 21investigation fee of $1,000 $100 more than once. When the 22application for an ambulatory currency exchange license has 23been approved by the Secretary, and such applicant so advised, 24such applicant shall pay an annual license fee of $3,000 $25 25for each and every location to be served by such applicant; 26provided that such license fee for an approved applicant   SB1512- 63 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1applying for such a license after July 1st of any year shall be 2$1,500 $12 for the balance of such year for each and every 3location to be served by such applicant. Such an approved 4applicant for an ambulatory currency exchange license, when 5applying for a license with respect to a particular location, 6shall file with the Secretary, at the time of filing an 7application, a letter of memorandum, which shall be in writing 8and under oath, signed by the owner or authorized 9representative of the business whose employees are to be 10served; such letter or memorandum shall contain a statement 11that such service is desired, and that the person signing the 12same is authorized so to do. The Secretary shall thereupon 13verify the authenticity of the letter or memorandum and the 14authority of the person who executed it, to do so.15    The Department shall have 45 business days to approve or 16deny a licensee's request to purchase another currency 17exchange. 18(Source: P.A. 99-445, eff. 1-1-16.) 19    (205 ILCS 405/14)  (from Ch. 17, par. 4823)20    Sec. 14. Every licensee, shall, on or before November 15, 21pay to the Secretary the annual license fee or fees for the 22next succeeding calendar year and shall at the same time file 23with the Secretary the annual bond or bonds and the insurance 24policy or policies as and if required by this Act. The annual 25license fee for each community currency exchange shall be   SB1512- 64 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1$3,000 $400 for each licensee and $3,000 $400 for each 2additional licensed location. The annual license fee for each 3location served by an ambulatory currency exchange shall be 4$3,000 $25.5(Source: P.A. 99-445, eff. 1-1-16; 99-549, eff. 7-15-16.) 6    (205 ILCS 405/16)  (from Ch. 17, par. 4832)7    Sec. 16. Annual report; investigation; costs. 8    (a) Each licensee shall annually, on or before the 1st day 9of March, file a report with the Secretary for the calendar 10year period from January 1st through December 31st, giving 11such relevant information as the Secretary may reasonably 12require concerning, and for the purpose of examining, the 13business and operations during the preceding fiscal year 14period of each licensed currency exchange conducted by such 15licensee within the State. Such report shall be made under 16oath and shall be in the form prescribed by the Secretary. The 17Secretary may at any time, and shall at least once in each 18year, investigate the currency exchange business of any 19licensee and of every person, partnership, association, 20limited liability company, and corporation who or which shall 21be engaged in the business of operating a currency exchange. 22For that purpose, the Secretary shall have free access to the 23offices and places of business and to such records of all such 24persons, firms, partnerships, associations, limited liability 25companies and members thereof, and corporations and to the   SB1512- 65 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1officers and directors thereof that shall relate to such 2currency exchange business. The investigation may be conducted 3in conjunction with representatives of other State agencies or 4agencies of another state or of the United States as 5determined by the Secretary. The Secretary may at any time 6inspect the locations served by an ambulatory currency 7exchange, for the purpose of determining whether such currency 8exchange is complying with the provisions of this Act at each 9location served. The Secretary may require by subpoena the 10attendance of and examine under oath all persons whose 11testimony he may require relative to such business, and in 12such cases the Secretary, or any qualified representative of 13the Secretary whom the Secretary may designate, may administer 14oaths to all such persons called as witnesses, and the 15Secretary, or any such qualified representative of the 16Secretary, may conduct such examinations, and there shall be 17paid to the Secretary for each such examination a fee of $1,200 18$250 for each day or part thereof for each qualified 19representative designated and required to conduct the 20examination; provided, however, that in the case of an 21ambulatory currency exchange, such fee shall be $1,200 $150 22for each day or part thereof.23    (b) Confidentiality. All information collected by the 24Department in the course of an examination or investigation of 25an ambulatory or community currency exchange or applicant, 26including, by not limited to, any complaint against an   SB1512- 66 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1ambulatory or community currency exchange filed with the 2Department, and information collected to investigate any such 3complaint shall be maintained for the confidential use of the 4Department and shall not be disclosed. The Department may not 5disclose such information to anyone other than law enforcement 6officials, other regulatory agencies that have an appropriate 7regulatory interest as determined by the Secretary, or to a 8party presenting a lawful subpoena to the Department. 9Information and documents disclosed to a federal, State, 10county, or local law enforcement agency shall not be disclosed 11by the agency for any purpose to any other agency or person. A 12formal complaint filed against a licensee by the Department or 13any order issued by the Department against a licensee shall be 14a public record, except as otherwise prohibited by law. 15(Source: P.A. 97-315, eff. 1-1-12.) 16    Section 95-10. The Sales Finance Agency Act is amended by 17changing Section 6 as follows: 18    (205 ILCS 660/6)  (from Ch. 17, par. 5206)19    Sec. 6. For each application for a license, the applicant 20shall pay a nonrefundable license fee of $3,000. A license fee 21of $300 for the applicant's principal place of business and 22$100 for each additional place of business for which a license 23is sought must be submitted with an application for license 24made before July 1 of any year. If application for a license is   SB1512- 67 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1made on July 1 or thereafter, a license fee of $150 for the 2principal place of business and of $50 for each additional 3place of business must accompany the application. Each license 4remains in force until surrendered, suspended, or revoked. If 5the application for license is denied, the original license 6fee shall be retained by the State in reimbursement of its 7costs of investigating that application.8    Before the license is granted, the applicant shall prove 9in form satisfactory to the Director, that the applicant has a 10positive net worth of a minimum of $30,000.11    A licensee must pay to the Department, and the Department 12must receive, by December 1 of each year, the renewal license 13application on forms prescribed by the Director and a 14nonrefundable license fee of $3,000 for each $300 for the 15license for his principal place of business and $100 for each 16additional license held as a renewal license fee for the 17succeeding calendar year.18(Source: P.A. 92-398, eff. 1-1-02.) 19    Section 95-15. The Debt Management Service Act is amended 20by changing Sections 4 and 6 as follows: 21    (205 ILCS 665/4)  (from Ch. 17, par. 5304)22    Sec. 4. Application for license. Application for a license 23to engage in the debt management service business in this 24State shall be made to the Secretary and shall be in writing,   SB1512- 68 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1under oath, and in the form prescribed by the Secretary.2    Each applicant, at the time of making such application, 3shall pay to the Secretary the sum of $30.00 as a fee for 4investigation of the applicant, and the additional sum of 5$1,000 $100.00 as a license fee.6    Every applicant shall submit to the Secretary, at the time 7of the application for a license, a bond to be approved by the 8Secretary in which the applicant shall be the obligor, in the 9sum of $25,000 or such additional amount as required by the 10Secretary based on the amount of disbursements made by the 11licensee in the previous year, and in which an insurance 12company, which is duly authorized by the State of Illinois, to 13transact the business of fidelity and surety insurance shall 14be a surety.15    The bond shall run to the Secretary for the use of the 16Department or of any person or persons who may have a cause of 17action against the obligor in said bond arising out of any 18violation of this Act or rules by a license. Such bond shall be 19conditioned that the obligor will faithfully conform to and 20abide by the provisions of this Act and of all rules, 21regulations and directions lawfully made by the Secretary and 22will pay to the Secretary or to any person or persons any and 23all money that may become due or owing to the State or to such 24person or persons, from said obligor under and by virtue of the 25provisions of this Act.26(Source: P.A. 96-1420, eff. 8-3-10.)   SB1512- 69 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1    (205 ILCS 665/6)  (from Ch. 17, par. 5306)2    Sec. 6. Renewal of license. Each debt management service 3provider under the provisions of this Act may make application 4to the Secretary for renewal of its license, which application 5for renewal shall be on the form prescribed by the Secretary 6and shall be accompanied by a fee of $1,000 $100.00 together 7with a bond or other surety as required, in a minimum amount of 8$25,000 or such an amount as required by the Secretary based on 9the amount of disbursements made by the licensee in the 10previous year. The application must be received by the 11Department no later than December 1 of the year preceding the 12year for which the application applies.13(Source: P.A. 96-1420, eff. 8-3-10.) 14    Section 95-20. The Consumer Installment Loan Act is 15amended by changing Sections 2, 4, and 12.5 as follows: 16    (205 ILCS 670/2)  (from Ch. 17, par. 5402)17    Sec. 2. Application; fees; positive net worth. Application 18for such license shall be in writing, and in the form 19prescribed by the Director. For each application for a 20license, the applicant shall pay a nonrefundable license fee 21of $3,000 Such applicant at the time of making such 22application shall pay to the Director the sum of $300 as an 23application fee and the additional sum of $450 as an annual   SB1512- 70 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1license fee, for a period terminating on the last day of the 2current calendar year; provided that if the application is 3filed after June 30th in any year, such license fee shall be 41/2 of the annual license fee for such year.5    Before the license is granted, every applicant shall prove 6in form satisfactory to the Director that the applicant has 7and will maintain a positive net worth of a minimum of $30,000. 8Every applicant and licensee shall maintain a surety bond in 9the principal sum of $25,000 issued by a bonding company 10authorized to do business in this State and which shall be 11approved by the Director. Such bond shall run to the Director 12and shall be for the benefit of any consumer who incurs damages 13as a result of any violation of the Act or rules by a licensee. 14If the Director finds at any time that a bond is of 15insufficient size, is insecure, exhausted, or otherwise 16doubtful, an additional bond in such amount as determined by 17the Director shall be filed by the licensee within 30 days 18after written demand therefor by the Director. "Net worth" 19means total assets minus total liabilities.20(Source: P.A. 92-398, eff. 1-1-02; 93-32, eff. 7-1-03.) 21    (205 ILCS 670/4)  (from Ch. 17, par. 5404)22    Sec. 4. Investigation to determine whether license shall 23be issued. Upon the filing of an application and the payment of 24the fee, the Director shall investigate to determine (1) that 25the reputation of the applicant, including managers of a   SB1512- 71 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1limited liability company, partners, owners, officers or 2directors thereof is such as to warrant belief that the 3business will be operated honestly and fairly within the 4purposes of this Act and (2) that the applicant meets the 5positive net worth requirement set forth in Section 2 of this 6Act. Unless the Director makes findings hereinabove 7enumerated, he or she shall not issue a license and shall 8notify the applicant of the denial and return to the applicant 9the sum paid by the applicant as a license fee, but shall 10retain the $300 application fee. The Director shall approve or 11deny every application for license hereunder within 60 days 12from the filing of a complete application thereof with the 13fee.14(Source: P.A. 90-437, eff. 1-1-98; 90-575, eff. 3-20-98.) 15    (205 ILCS 670/12.5)16    Sec. 12.5. Limited purpose branch. 17    (a) Upon the written approval of the Director, a licensee 18may maintain a limited purpose branch for the sole purpose of 19making loans as permitted by this Act. A limited purpose 20branch may include an automatic loan machine. No other 21activity shall be conducted at the site, including but not 22limited to, accepting payments, servicing the accounts, or 23collections.24    (b) The licensee must submit an application for a limited 25purpose branch to the Director on forms prescribed by the   SB1512- 72 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1Director with an application fee of $3,000 $300. The approval 2for the limited purpose branch must be renewed concurrently 3with the renewal of the licensee's license along with a 4renewal fee of $3,000 $300 for the limited purpose branch.5    (c) The books, accounts, records, and files of the limited 6purpose branch's transactions shall be maintained at the 7licensee's licensed location. The licensee shall notify the 8Director of the licensed location at which the books, 9accounts, records, and files shall be maintained.10    (d) The licensee shall prominently display at the limited 11purpose branch the address and telephone number of the 12licensee's licensed location.13    (e) No other business shall be conducted at the site of the 14limited purpose branch unless authorized by the Director.15    (f) The Director shall make and enforce reasonable rules 16for the conduct of a limited purpose branch.17    (g) A limited purpose branch may not be located within 181,000 feet of a facility operated by an inter-track wagering 19licensee or an organization licensee subject to the Illinois 20Horse Racing Act of 1975, on a riverboat or in a casino subject 21to the Illinois Gambling Act, or within 1,000 feet of the 22location at which the riverboat docks or within 1,000 feet of a 23casino.24(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.) 25    Section 95-25. The Debt Settlement Consumer Protection Act   SB1512- 73 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1is amended by changing Section 30 as follows: 2    (225 ILCS 429/30)3    Sec. 30. Renewal of license. Each debt settlement provider 4under the provisions of this Act may make application to the 5Secretary for renewal of its license, which application for 6renewal shall be on the form prescribed by the Secretary and 7shall be accompanied by a fee of $3,000 $1,000 together with a 8bond or other surety as required, in a minimum amount of 9$100,000 or an amount as required by the Secretary based on the 10amount of disbursements made by the licensee in the previous 11year. The application must be received by the Department no 12later than December 1 of the year preceding the year for which 13the application applies. 14(Source: P.A. 96-1420, eff. 8-3-10; 97-333, eff. 8-12-11.) 15Article 999. Miscellaneous Provisions; Effective Date 16    Section 999-95. Construction; severability. 17    (a) The provisions of this Act shall be liberally 18construed to effectuate its purposes.19    (b) The provisions of this Act are severable under Section 201.31 of the Statute on Statutes.21    (c) To the extent that any provision of this Act is 22preempted by federal law, the provision shall not apply and 23shall not be enforced solely as to the extent of the preemption   SB1512- 74 -LRB104 09816 BAB 19883 b1and not as to other circumstances, persons, or applications. 2    Section 999-99. Effective date. This Act takes effect 3January 1, 2026.